Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201858-827
Authority; issuance of bonds authorized.

The
authority may issue bonds of the authority for any of its corporate purposes
and fund or refund the same pursuant to the Nebraska Educational, Health, and Social Services Finance
Authority Act.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 24;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2924;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 24;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1724;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 27.